Utah statutes.
38-1a-801.   Preconstruction and construction liens assignable -- Action by assignee to enforce lien.

(1)  A preconstruction lien or construction lien is assignable as any other chose in action.

(2)  An assignee of a preconstruction lien or construction lien may, in the assignee's own name, commence and prosecute an action on the lien as provided in Part 7, Enforcement of Preconstruction and Construction Liens.

